apertium-cs-sl.cs.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ůŮčČćĆžŽšŠđĐABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzěřňĚŘŇąĄáéíóúÁÉÍÓÚýÝťľďTĽĎ</alphabet>
  <sdefs> 
    <sdef n="n"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"     c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="adj"    c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv"    c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="num"    c="Numeral / Number"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"  c="The verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"  c="Lexical verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"   c="Auxilliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"  c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="part"   c="Particle"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"   c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="preadv" c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="predet" c="Pre determiner"/>
    <sdef n="ij"     c="Interjection"/>

    <sdef n="p1"     c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="m"      c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="ma"     c="Masculine / animate"/>
    <sdef n="mi"     c="Masculine / inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="f"      c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"     c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"     c="Masculine-Feminine"/>

    <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="du"     c="Dual number"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"     c="Singular / Plural"/>

    <sdef n="nom"    c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"    c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="dat"    c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"    c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="loc"    c="Locative"/>
    <sdef n="ins"    c="Instrumental"/>
    <sdef n="voc"    c="Vocative"/>

    <sdef n="past"   c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pres"   c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="inf"    c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="fti"    c="Future indicative"/>
    <sdef n="imp"    c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pass"   c="Passive participle"/>
    <sdef n="trans"  c="Transgressive participle"/>
    <sdef n="pp"     c="Past participle"/>

    <sdef n="enc"    c="Enclitic"/>
    <sdef n="pro"    c="Proclitic"/>
    <sdef n="itg"    c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="neg"    c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="ord"    c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="ind"    c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"    c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"    c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="pos"    c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="dem"    c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="rel"    c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="ref"    c="Reflexive"/>

    <sdef n="sint"   c="Synthetic adjective"/>
    <sdef n="pst"    c="Postive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"   c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"    c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="acr"    c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"    c="Antroponym"/>
    <sdef n="top"    c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="al"     c="Other / Otros"/>

    <sdef n="nn"     c="Inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="an"     c="Inanimate / animate"/>
    <sdef n="aa"     c="Animate"/>

    <sdef n="cm"     c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"   c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"   c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquest" c="Left question-mark"/>
    <sdef n="guio"   c="Hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="apos"   c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="sent"   c="End of sentence"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <!-- Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Numerals -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="XI__num">
      <e>       <p>          <l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="I"><i>I</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="II"><i>II</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="III"><i>III</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="IX"><i>IX</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="V"><i>V</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VI"><i>VI</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VII"><i>VII</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VIII"><i>VIII</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="X"><i>X</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XI"><i>XI</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XII"><i>XII</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XIII"><i>XIII</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XIV"><i>XIV</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XIX"><i>XIX</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XL"><i>XL</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XV"><i>XV</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVI"><i>XVI</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVII"><i>XVII</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVIII"><i>XVIII</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XX"><i>XX</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXI"><i>XXI</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXII"><i>XXII</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXIII"><i>XXIII</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXV"><i>XXV</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXVI"><i>XXVI</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXX"><i>XXX</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="desetkrát"><i>desetkrát</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="devětkrát"><i>devětkrát</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dvacetkrát"><i>dvacetkrát</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="jedenkrát"><i>jedenkrát</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="jedinkrát"><i>jedinkrát</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="jednou"><i>jednou</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="kolikrát"><i>kolikrát</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="mockrát"><i>mockrát</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nejednou"><i>nejednou</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="podesáté"><i>podesáté</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="podeváté"><i>podeváté</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="podruhé"><i>podruhé</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pokolikáté"><i>pokolikáté</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="poosmé"><i>poosmé</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="poprvé"><i>poprvé</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="popáté"><i>popáté</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="posedmé"><i>posedmé</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="potřetí"><i>potřetí</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="počtvrté"><i>počtvrté</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pošesté"><i>pošesté</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="párkrát"><i>párkrát</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pětkrát"><i>pětkrát</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="stokrát"><i>stokrát</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="třikrát"><i>třikrát</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="víckrát"><i>víckrát</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="čtyřikrát"><i>čtyřikrát</i><par n="XI__num"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
